mn_MN/mn_MN.aff
FLAG long
REP ^түвшингөө төвшнөө
REP ^түвшингээ төвшнөө
REP ^түвшингээрээ төвшнөөрөө
REP ^түвшингээсээ төвшнөөсөө
REP ^түвшиндээ төвшиндөө
REP ^түвшиний төвшний
REP ^түвшинээ төвшнөө
REP ^түвшитгэ төвшитгө
REP ^түвшнийн төвшний
REP ^түвшнийнх төвшнийх
REP ^түвшнийнхээ төвшнийхөө
REP ^түвшнийнхээрээ төвшнийхөөрөө
REP ^түвшнийнхээсээ төвшнийхөөсөө
REP ^түвшнийхээ төвшнийхөө
REP ^түвшнийхээрээ төвшнийхөөрөө
REP ^түвшнийхээсээ төвшнийхөөсөө
REP ^түвшнээ төвшнөө
REP ^түвшнээрээ төвшнөөрөө
REP ^түвшнээсээ төвшнөөсөө
REP ^түвэг төвөг
REP ^түвэгшээ төвөгшөө
REP ^түмбийлгэ төмбийлгө
REP ^түмбийсэ төмбийсө
REP ^түмбийхэ төмбийхө
REP ^түмнүүд түмэн
REP ^түмнүүдийг түмнийг
REP ^түмнүүдийн түмний
REP ^түмнүүдэд түмэнд
REP ^түмпэн төмпөн
REP ^түмпэнгийнхээ төмпөнгийнхөө
REP ^түмпэнгээ төмпөнгөө
REP ^түмпэндээ төмпөндөө
REP ^тэдгүй тэдэнгүй
REP ^тэднүүс$ тэд_нар
REP ^тэднүүсий тэд_нары
REP ^тэднүүст$ тэд_нарт
REP ^тэднүүстэй тэд_нартай
REP ^тэднүүстээ$ тэд_нартаа
REP ^тэднүүсээ тэд_нараа
REP ^тэдтэй тэдэнтэй
REP ^тэргүй түүнгүй
REP ^тэрийгээр түүгээр
REP ^тэрний түүний
REP ^тэрнээс түүнээс
REP ^тэрүүн түүн
REP ^тэрүүнд түүнд
REP ^тэрүүний түүний
REP ^тэрэн түүн
REP ^тэрэн$ түүн
REP ^Уилиам Уильям
REP ^Уиллиам Уильям
REP ^үгнүүд үгс
REP ^үгүүд үгс
REP ^үгүүлв өгүүлб
REP ^үмхий өмхий
REP ^үмхийгий өмхий
REP ^үмхийгээ өмхийгөө
REP ^үмхийдээ өмхийдөө
REP ^үмхийрсэн өмхийрсөн
REP ^үмхийртлээ өмхийртлөө
REP ^үмхийртэл өмхийртөл
REP ^үмхийрэ өмхийрө
REP ^үнс үнэс
REP ^хаадууд хаад
REP ^хаач хаашаа_яв
REP ^хаачсан хаашаа_явсан
REP ^хаачсан хаашаа_явсн
REP ^хаачсан хаашаа_явчихсан
REP ^хааччихав хаашаа_явчхав
REP ^хатингишир хатангирш
REP ^хатингиширч хатангиршиж
REP ^хатингишр хатангирш
REP ^хашгач хашхич
REP ^хирэндээ хэрдээ
REP ^хоёрдах хоёр_дахь
REP ^хоёрдахы хоёр_дахий
REP ^хождо хожимдо
REP ^хомрогл хоморгол
REP ^хомсло хумсла
REP ^хомслоо хумслаа
REP ^хомсол хумсал
REP ^хомсолсо хумсалса
REP ^хондон хундан
REP ^хошногын хошногоны
REP ^хөвөр хүвэр
REP ^хөвөрвө хүвэрвэ
REP ^хөвөрвөө хүвэрвээ
REP ^хөвөрдвө хүвэрдвэ
REP ^хөвөрдвөө хүвэрдвээ
REP ^хөвөрдө хүвэрдэ
REP ^хөвөрнө хүвэрнэ
REP ^хөвөрсө хүвэрсэ
REP ^хөвөрсөө хүвэрсээ
REP ^хөвөрчихвө хүвэрчихвэ
REP ^хөвөрчихө хүвэрчихэ
REP ^хөвөрчихсө хүвэрчихсэ
REP ^хөврө хүврэ
REP ^хөврөл хүврэл
REP ^хөврөлдө хүврэлдэ
REP ^хөврөлдөө хүврэлдээ
REP ^хөврөлдсө хүврэлдсэ
REP ^хөврөлийнхөө хүврэлийнхээ
REP ^хөврөлөө хүврэлээ
REP ^хөврөө хүврээ
REP ^хөврөхө хүврэхэ
REP ^хөврөхөө хүврэхээ
REP ^хөвүү хөвгүү
REP ^хөмүүл хөмл
REP ^хөмүүл хөмөл
REP ^хөмүүлээ хөмлөө
REP ^хуанли цаглавар
REP ^хуанлиг цаглавр
REP ^хуанлиг цаглаврыг
REP ^хуанлид цаглаварт
REP ^хуанлий цаглавры
REP ^хуйцаа хууцай
REP ^хэвгэнд хивэгт
REP ^хэвэгний хивгийн
REP ^хэвэгнээс хивгээс
REP ^хэлц хэлэлц
REP ^хэрэндээ хэрдээ
REP ^царг цариг
REP ^шавиуд шавь_нар
REP ^шавхард шавхуурд
REP ^шавьж шавж
REP ^шавьжинд шавжид
REP ^шавьжнаа шавжаа
REP ^шавьжний шавжийн
REP ^шавьжнууд шавжууд
REP ^шавьжны шавжийн
REP ^шашд шаст
REP ^шашда шасти
REP ^шашдарий шастиры
REP ^шашдирий шастиры
REP ^шаштарий шастиры
REP ^шаштирий шастиры
REP ^шивгэн шивн
REP ^шивэгн шивн
REP ^шуламнууд шуламс
REP ^шулмууд шуламс
REP ^шүдэнз чүдэнз
REP ^шүдэнзээ чүдэнзнээ
REP ^шүдэнзээ чүдэнзээ
REP ^шүүдээ шүү_дээ
REP ^э-майл имэйл
REP ^э-мэйл имэйл
REP ^эдгүй эдэнгүй
REP ^эднүүс$ эд_нар
REP ^эднүүсий эд_нары
REP ^эднүүсийгээ$ эд_нарыгаа
REP ^эднүүст$ эд_нарт
REP ^эднүүстэй эд_нартай
REP ^эднүүстээ$ эд_нартаа
REP ^эднүүсээ эд_нараа
REP ^эдтэй эдэнтэй
REP ^эздүүд эзэд
REP ^эмайл имэйл
REP ^эмгэчүүл эмгэд
REP ^эмгэчүүлд эмгэдэд
REP ^эмэйл имэйл
REP ^энийг үүнийг
REP ^энүүгээр үүгээр
REP ^энүүний үүний
REP ^энэний үүний
REP ^энэнээс үүнээс
REP ^эхэс ихс
REP ^эхэс ихэс
REP ^эш иш
REP ^эшлэ ишил
REP ^эшлэе ишилье
REP ^юмуу юм_уу
REP ^юмүү юм_үү
REP ^яалтачгүй$ яалт_ч_үгүй
REP ^яалтчгүй$ яалт_ч_үгүй
REP ^яамдууд яамд
REP ^яасийн$ яасан_юм_бэ
REP ^ява жава
REP ^явааг явж_байгааг
REP ^яваадаа явж_байгаадаа
REP аав$ аа_вэ
REP вбаа$ вах_вий
REP вбоо$ вох_вий
REP вбөө$ вөх_вий
REP вбээ$ вэх_вий
REP вваа$ вах_вий
REP ввоо$ вох_вий
REP ввөө$ вөх_вий
REP ввээ$ вэх_вий
REP дан$ д_нь
REP дон$ д_нь
REP дох$ _дахь
REP дохы _дахий
REP дөн$ д_нь
REP дөх _дэх
REP дөхө _дэхэ
REP дөхөө _дэхээ
REP дэн$ д_нь
REP жингаа$ жин
REP жингоо$ жин
REP жингөө$ жин
REP жингээ$ жин
REP ийшдээ$ на_шүү_дээ
REP луу$ _уруу
REP луугаа$ _уруугаа
REP лүү$ _уруу
REP лүүгээ$ _уруугаа
REP м$ _юм
REP ман$ ам
REP мон$ ом
REP мөн$ өм
REP мэн$ эм
REP наа на_аа
REP наа$ ад
REP нав$ на_вэ
REP нов$ но_вэ
REP ноо но_оо
REP ноо$ од
REP нөв$ нө_вэ
REP нөө нө_өө
REP нөө$ өд
REP нэв$ нэ_вэ
REP нээ нэ_ээ
REP нээ$ эд
REP оов$ оо_вэ
REP өөв$ өө_вэ
REP руу$ _уруу
REP руугаа$ _уруугаа
REP руун$ ав
REP руун$ рав
REP рүү$ _уруу
REP рүүгээ$ _уруугаа
REP рүүн$ рэв
REP рүүн$ эв
REP хав$ ах_вэ
REP хав$ х_вэ
REP хнадаа$ х_нь_даа
REP хнодоо$ х_нь_доо
REP хнөдөө$ х_нь_дөө
REP хнэдээ$ х_нь_дээ
REP хов$ ох_вэ
REP хов$ х_вэ
REP хөв$ өх_вэ
REP хөв$ х_вэ
REP хэв$ х_вэ
REP хэв$ эх_вэ
REP чихваа$ чих_вий
REP чихвийдэ$ чих_вий_дээ
REP чихвийдээ$ чих_вий_дээ
REP чихвоо$ чих_вий
REP чихвөө$ чих_вий
REP чихвээ$ чих_вий
REP чээ$ ч_ээ
REP ээв$ ээ_вэ
REP ямарч$ ямар_ч

MAP 17
MAP (ѐ)ё(Ѐ)Ё
MAP (ё)ё(Ё)Ё
MAP (й)й(Й)Й
MAP aаAА
MAP cсCС
MAP eеEЕ
MAP kкKК
MAP mт
MAP oоOО
MAP pрPР
MAP TТHНYҮ
MAP vүVҮ
MAP xхXХ
MAP yуyү
MAP єөЄӨ
MAP їүЇҮ
MAP ѳөѲӨ

KEY ещ|фцужэнгшүзкъ|йыбөахролдп|ячёсмитьвю|фйц|ыйн|цыу|быч|ын|
убж|өбё|бч|жөэ|аөс|өё|эая|хам|ас|яхг|рхи|хм|грш|орт|ри|шоү|лот

SFX N0 Y 83
SFX N0 0 аа [^айиуьяеёю]
SFX N0 0 аар/00 [^айиуьяеёю]
SFX N0 0 аас/00 [^айиуьяеёю]
SFX N0 0 ад [^аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX N0 0 даа [^аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX N0 0 ад [дтзцх]
SFX N0 0 даа [дтзцх]
SFX N0 0 а [^айиуярхчцль][аияюеё]
SFX N0 0 ар/00 [^айиуярхчцль][аяюеё]
SFX N0 0 ас/00 [^айиуярхчцль][аяюеё]
SFX N0 0 ар/00 и
SFX N0 0 ас/00 и
SFX N0 0 г/00 [аойиуяеёрхчцшь][ауйяюеё]
SFX N0 0 гаар/00 [аойиуяеёрхчцшль][ауйяюеё]
SFX N0 0 гаас/00 [аойиуяеёрхчцшль][ауйяюеё]
SFX N0 0 г/00 ы
SFX N0 0 гаар/00 ы
SFX N0 0 гаас/00 ы
SFX N0 0 гийн [аойиуярхчцшль][ауяюеё]
SFX N0 0 гийнд/00 [аойиуярхчцшль][ауяюеё]
SFX N0 0 гийнх/040870 [аойиуярхчцшль][ауяюеё]
SFX N0 0 д [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N0 0 даа [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N0 0 д [^дтжзсшцчхгкврфь]
SFX N0 0 даа [^дтжзсшцчхгкврфь]
SFX N0 0 ид/00 [жчш]
SFX N0 0 ийг/00 [гкжчш]
SFX N0 0 ийн [гкжчш]
SFX N0 0 ийнд/00 [гкжчш]
SFX N0 0 ийнх/040870 [гкжчш]
SFX N0 0 йг/00 [^айиуюя]и
SFX N0 0 йн [^айиуюя]и
SFX N0 0 йнд/00 [^айиуюя]и
SFX N0 0 йнх/040870 [^айиуюя]и
SFX N0 0 н [аиуяеюё]й
SFX N0 0 нд/00 [аиуяюеё]й
SFX N0 0 нх/040870 [аиуяюеё]й
SFX N0 0 н ы
SFX N0 0 нд/00 ы
SFX N0 0 нх/040870 ы
SFX N0 0 ад [^ауяеюий]с
SFX N0 0 даа [^ауяюеий]с
SFX N0 0 т [аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX N0 0 таа [аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX N0 0 т [гкврф]
SFX N0 0 таа [гкврф]
SFX N0 0 ы н
SFX N0 0 ыг/00 [^аоийуьгкжчшяюеё]
SFX N0 0 ыд/00 н
SFX N0 0 ын [^аойиуьнгкжчшяюеё]
SFX N0 0 ынд/00 [^аойиуьнгкжчшяюеё]
SFX N0 0 ынх/040870 [^аоийуьнгкжчшяюеё]
SFX N0 0 ых/040870 н
SFX N0 а ыг/00 [^айиуярхжчш]а
SFX N0 а ын [^айиуярхжчш]а
SFX N0 а ынд/00 [^айиуярхжчш]а
SFX N0 а ынх/040870 [^айиуярхжчш]а
SFX N0 о аа [^айиуярхжчш]о
SFX N0 о аар/00 [^айиуярхжчш]о
SFX N0 о аас/00 [^айиуярхжчш]о
SFX N0 о ыг/00 [^айиуярхжчш]о
SFX N0 о ын [^айиуярхжчш]о
SFX N0 о ынд/00 [^айиуярхжчш]о
SFX N0 о ынх/040870 [^айиуярхжчш]о
SFX N0 е аа [^аойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N0 е аар/00 [^аойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N0 е аас/00 [^аойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N0 е ыг/00 [^айиуярхжчш]е
SFX N0 е ын [^айиуярхжчш]е
SFX N0 е ынд/00 [^айиуярхжчш]е
SFX N0 е ынх/040870 [^айиуярхжчш]е
SFX N0 ь иа ь
SFX N0 ь иар/00 ь
SFX N0 ь иас/00 ь
SFX N0 ь ид/00 [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N0 ь ийг/00 ь
SFX N0 ь ийн ь
SFX N0 ь ийнд/00 ь
SFX N0 ь ийнх/040870 ь
SFX N0 ь итай/70 [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N0 0 тай/70 [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N0 0 тай/70 [^ь]
SFX N0 0 гүй/73 .

SFX N1 Y 83
SFX N1 0 гийн [аойиуярхчцшль][аоуяюеё]
SFX N1 0 гийнд/01 [аойиуярхчцшль][аоуяюеё]
SFX N1 0 гийнх/050871 [аойиуярхчцшль][аоуяюеё]
SFX N1 0 г/01 [аойиуяеёрхчцшь][аоуйяюеё]
SFX N1 0 гоор/01 [аойиуяеёрхчцшль][аоуйяюеё]
SFX N1 0 гоос/01 [аойиуяеёрхчцшль][аоуйяюеё]
SFX N1 0 г/01 ы
SFX N1 0 гоор/01 ы
SFX N1 0 гоос/01 ы
SFX N1 0 д [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N1 0 доо [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N1 0 д [^дтжзсшцчхгкврфь]
SFX N1 0 доо [^дтжзсшцчхгкврфь]
SFX N1 0 ид/01 [жчш]
SFX N1 0 ийг/01 [гкжчш]
SFX N1 0 ийн [гкжчш]
SFX N1 0 ийнд/01 [гкжчш]
SFX N1 0 ийнх/050871 [гкжчш]
SFX N1 0 йг/01 [^ойиуяю]и
SFX N1 0 йн [^ойиуюя]и
SFX N1 0 йнд/01 [^ойиуяю]и
SFX N1 0 йнх/050871 [^ойиуяю]и
SFX N1 0 н [оиуяеюё]й
SFX N1 0 нд/01 [оиуяюеё]й
SFX N1 0 нх/050871 [оиуяюеё]й
SFX N1 0 н ы
SFX N1 0 нд/01 ы
SFX N1 0 нх/050871 ы
SFX N1 0 од [^аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX N1 0 доо [^аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX N1 0 од [дтзцх]
SFX N1 0 доо [дтзцх]
SFX N1 0 оо [^аойиуьяюеё]
SFX N1 0 оор/01 [^аойиуьяюеё]
SFX N1 0 оос/01 [^аойиуьяюеё]
SFX N1 0 о [^ойиуярхчцль][оияюеё]
SFX N1 0 ор/01 [^ойиуярхчцль][ояюеё]
SFX N1 0 ос/01 [^ойиуярхчцль][ояюеё]
SFX N1 0 ор/01 и
SFX N1 0 ос/01 и
SFX N1 0 т [аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX N1 0 тоо [аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX N1 0 од [^аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX N1 0 доо [^аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX N1 0 т [гкврф]
SFX N1 0 тоо [гкврф]
SFX N1 0 ы н
SFX N1 0 ыг/01 [^аоийуьгкжчшяеёю]
SFX N1 0 ыд/01 н
SFX N1 0 ын [^аойиуьнгкжчшяеёю]
SFX N1 0 ынд/01 [^аойиуьнгкжчшяеёю]
SFX N1 0 ынх/050871 [^аоийуьнгкжчшяеё]
SFX N1 0 ых/050871 н
SFX N1 о ыг/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]о
SFX N1 о ын [^ойиуярхжчш]о
SFX N1 о ынд/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]о
SFX N1 о ынх/050871 [^ойиуярхжчш]о
SFX N1 а ыг/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]а
SFX N1 а оо [^ойиуярхжчш]а
SFX N1 а оор/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]а
SFX N1 а оос/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]а
SFX N1 а ын [^ойиуярхжчш]а
SFX N1 а ынд/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]а
SFX N1 а ынх/050871 [^ойиуярхжчш]а
SFX N1 е оо [^ойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N1 е оор/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N1 е оос/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N1 е ыг/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N1 е ын [^ойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N1 е ынд/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N1 е ынх/050871 [^ойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N1 ь ид/01 [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N1 ь ийг/01 ь
SFX N1 ь ийн ь
SFX N1 ь ийнд/01 ь
SFX N1 ь ийнх/050871 ь
SFX N1 ь ио ь
SFX N1 ь иор/01 ь
SFX N1 ь иос/01 ь
SFX N1 ь итой/71 [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N1 0 той/71 [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N1 0 той/71 [^ь]
SFX N1 0 гүй/73 .

SFX N2 Y 56
SFX N2 0 гийн [өэйиүерхчцшльт][өүяюеё]
SFX N2 0 гийнд/02 [өэйиүерхчцшльт][өүяюеё]
SFX N2 0 гийнх/060872 [өэйиүерхчцшльт][өүяюеё]
SFX N2 0 г/02 [өэйиүерхчцшьт][өүйяюеё]
SFX N2 0 гөөр/02 [өэйиүерхчшцльт][өүйяюеё]
SFX N2 0 гөөс/02 [өэйиүерхчцшльт][өүйяюеё]
SFX N2 0 д [^дтжзсшцчхгкврфь]
SFX N2 0 дөө [^дтжзсшцчхгкврфь]
SFX N2 0 ид/02 [жчш]
SFX N2 0 ий н
SFX N2 0 ийг/02 [^өэийүяюеё]
SFX N2 0 ийд/02 н
SFX N2 0 ийн [^өэйиүняюеё]
SFX N2 0 ийнд/02 [^өэйиүняюеё]
SFX N2 0 ийнх/060872 [^өэийүняюеё]
SFX N2 0 ийх/060872 н
SFX N2 0 йг/02 [^өэйиүе]и
SFX N2 0 йн [^өэйиүе]и
SFX N2 0 йнд/02 [^өэйиүе]и
SFX N2 0 йнх/060872 [^өэйиүе]и
SFX N2 0 н [өэиүяюеё]й
SFX N2 0 нд/02 [өэиүяюеё]й
SFX N2 0 нх/060872 [өэиүяюеё]й
SFX N2 0 өд [^аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX N2 0 дөө [^аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX N2 0 өд [дтзцх]
SFX N2 0 дөө [дтзцх]
SFX N2 0 өө [^өэйиүюе]
SFX N2 0 өөр/02 [^өэйиүяюеё]
SFX N2 0 өөс/02 [^өэйиүяюеё]
SFX N2 0 ө [^өэйиүерхчцль][иөяюеё]
SFX N2 0 өр/02 [^өэйиүерхчцль][өяюеё]
SFX N2 0 өс/02 [^өэйиүерхчцль][өяюеё]
SFX N2 0 өр/02 и
SFX N2 0 өс/02 и
SFX N2 0 т [аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX N2 0 төө [аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX N2 0 өд [^аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX N2 0 дөө [^аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX N2 0 т [гкврф]
SFX N2 0 төө [гкврф]
SFX N2 ө ийг/02 [^өэйиүерх]ө
SFX N2 ө ийн [^өэйиүерх]ө
SFX N2 ө ийнд/02 [^өэйиүерх]ө
SFX N2 ө ийнх/060872 [^өэйиүерх]ө
SFX N2 е өө [^өэйиүерх]е
SFX N2 е өөр/02 [^өэйиүерх]е
SFX N2 е өөс/02 [^өэйиүерх]е
SFX N2 е ийг/02 [^өэйиүерх]е
SFX N2 е ийн [^өэйиүерх]е
SFX N2 е ийнд/02 [^өэйиүерх]е
SFX N2 е ийнх/060872 [^өэйиүерх]е
SFX N2 ь итэй/72 [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N2 0 тэй/72 [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N2 0 тэй/72 [^ь]
SFX N2 0 гүй/73 .
